Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-213.04
Employee benefit plans; suspension by director; when allowed.

Whenever the Director of Insurance finds the suspension of contributions by any domestic insurance company to any plan for retirement, disability, sickness, accident, or death benefits to be necessary to protect and conserve the interests of the policyholders, he shall order such suspension, stating the reasons thereof. At such time thereafter as said condition no longer exists, he may permit the company to resume such contributions.

Laws 1953, c. 146, § 5, p. 472.